Tennessee statutes. Title 27 Appeal And Review
Chapter 4

Appeals from County Court

27-4-101. Appeal to circuit court.

Any party dissatisfied with the sentence, judgment, or decree of the county court, may pray an appeal to the circuit court of the county, unless it is otherwise expressly provided.

Code 1858, § 3147 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 99); Shan., § 4879; mod. Code 1932, § 9028; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-401.

Cross-References. Appeal from county court cases other than equity, §27-3-107.

Proceedings to establish utility district, §7-82-204.

Writ of error to circuit court, §§27-6-101,27-6-103.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 326, 363, 555, 588.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 22, 30.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. LeClercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.

27-4-102. Appeal to appellate court.

In all cases in which the jurisdiction of the county court is concurrent with the circuit or chancery courts, or in which both parties consent, the appeal lies direct to the court of appeals or supreme court, as the case may be.

Code 1858, § 3148 (deriv. Acts 1813, ch. 78, § 2; 1855-1856, ch. 116, § 5); Shan., § 4880; Code 1932, § 9029; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-402.

Cross-References. Appeals in nature of writ of error, §27-3-107.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 56, 326, 845.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 16, 22.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

The Tennessee Court System — The County Court, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 419.

27-4-103. Term to which taken.

The appeal is to the next term of the circuit court, if more than five (5) days intervene between the date of appeal and the first day of the term. If less time intervene, the appeal is to the next succeeding term.

Code 1858, § 3149; Shan., § 4881; Code 1932, § 9030; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-403.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 555.

27-4-104. Transcript to circuit court.

A transcript of the record of the suit, on which the appeal is made, shall be delivered to the clerk of the circuit court by the first day of the term to which the appeal is taken, unless the time be extended by the court.

Code 1858, § 3150 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 66); Shan., § 4882; mod. Code 1932, § 9031; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-404.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 555, 845.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 58.

27-4-105. Copy of proceedings by clerk.

The county clerk, upon appeal taken, shall immediately make a full and perfect copy of all the proceedings in the cause, and, within five (5) days after the appeal, give the same, with a taxation of all costs accrued, to the appellant, if required, and endorse on the copy the day on which it was demanded, and the day on which it was delivered, and sign the clerk's name thereto; or, if the same is not demanded before the first day of the next circuit court, the county clerk shall then deliver the same to the circuit court clerk.

Code 1858, § 3153 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 68); Shan., § 4885; Code 1932, § 9034; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-405.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 58.

27-4-106. Receipt of transcript by circuit court clerk.

The clerk of the circuit court, upon receiving the transcript, shall give a receipt to the person delivering it, and immediately endorse thereon the date of its delivery, and shall enter it on the proper docket.

Code 1858, § 3154 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 69); Shan., 4886; Code 1932, § 9035; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-406.

27-4-107. Affirmance on default of appellant.

If the transcript is not filed within the time prescribed in §27-4-104, or if the appellant shall fail to appear, or to prosecute an appeal, the judgment or decree of the county court may, in the discretion of the court, be affirmed.

Code 1858, § 3151 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 66); Shan., § 4883; mod. Code 1932, § 9032; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-407.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 555.

27-4-108. Trial de novo.

On appeal, all jury cases in the county court shall be tried de novo in the circuit court and all chancery cases, or proceedings in the nature of chancery cases, shall be reheard as if the proceedings had been commenced in the circuit court.

Code 1858, § 3152 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 66); Shan., § 4884; Code 1932, § 9033; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 27-408.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 555, 588.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 207.

Law Reviews.

Procedure and Evidence — 1960 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 13 Vand. L. Rev. 1197.

Tennessee Procedure — The Simple Appeal, 35 Tenn. L. Rev. 642.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

Trial, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 335.